sl-SI: Standardna velikost štafetne palice: Junior; Senior; Drugo
tr: Bayrak yarışı baton boyut standardı: Genç; Yetişkin; Diğer
nl: Baton maatstandaard: Junior; Senior; Overig
fr: Taille standard du témoin: Junior; Senior; Autre
el: Τυποποιημένο μέγεθος της μπαγκέτας/ράβδου: Junior; Senior; Άλλο
fi: Kapulan kokostandardi: Juniori; Aikuinen; Muu
bg-BG: Стандарт за размер на палката: За юноши; За възрастни; Друго
en: Baton size standard: Junior; Senior; Other
pt-BR: Padrão de tamanho do bastão: Júnior; Sênior; Outro
sv: Standardstorlek för stafettpinnar: Junior; Senior; Övrigt
ru: Стандарт размера эстафетной палочки: Подростковый (Junior); Взрослый (Senior); Другое
nb: Batongstørrelse standard: Junior; Senior; Annet
cs: Velikostní standard štafetového kolíku: Junior; Senior; Jiné
zh-CN: 接力棒尺寸标准: 青少年; 成人; 其他
hr-HR: Standardna veličina palice: Za juniore; Za seniore; Ostalo
it: Baton taglia standard: Junior; Senior; Altro
de: Staffelstabgröße: Junior; Senior; Sonstige
lt-LT: Standartinis lazdelės dydis: Jaunių; Suaugusiųjų; Kita
pl: Standard rozmiaru pałeczki sztafetowej: Junior; Senior; Inne
es: Estándar de tamaño del testimonio: Júnior; Sénior; Otro
ko: 배턴 크기 규격: 주니어; 시니어; 기타
hu: Batonméret szabványa: Junior; Senior; Egyéb
sk-SK: Štandardná veľkosť štafetového kolíka: Junior; Senior; Iné
vi: Tiêu chuẩn kích thước gậy tiếp sức: Trẻ em; Người lớn; Khác
ja: バトンサイズ標準: ジュニア; シニア; その他
da: Standardstørrelse på dirigentbaton: Junior; Senior; Andet
th: ขนาดไม้ส่งวิ่งผลัดมาตรฐาน: เด็ก; ผู้ใหญ่; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tamanho padrão do bastão: Júnior; Sénior; Outro
zh-TW: 接力棒尺寸標準: 兒童; 成人; 其他
ro-RO: Standardul dimensiunilor batonului: Junior; Senior; Altele